Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.295

Rejection of proposal.

If a proposal for the formation of a new school district and for adjustment of bonded indebtedness, or either, is rejected by the registered voters at a special election, the matter is terminated.

[ 1999 c 315 s 706.]